










 













 














RXR Realty







































×




















LEADING THE WAY

View the RXR Video
View the RXR Video
View the RXR Video








Real Estate owner, operator & value creator










Redevelopment
Commemorating the Topping Out of Pier 57
RXR Realty's Scott Rechler thanks the labor force working on Pier 57 for the extraordinary commitment and tireless dedication towards making the redevelopment of the historic structure a success.

Follow @rxr_realty on Instagram and @scottrechler on Twitter. [...]
 






Acquisition
Fort Greene Parking Lot will Give Way to Massive Rental Building
By Tanay Warerkar, Curbed New York

A massive new rental building is set to rise on a former parking lot in Fort Greene, courtesy of RXR Realty, probably best known for their Pier 57 redevelopment project. The 12-story building will also mark the developer’s first residential project, Crain’s reports.

Located at 810 Fulton Street, the building will include 363 apartments, about 20 percent of which will be affordable. The project came about after RXR purchased the lease on the property from development firm GFI Development for $28.7 million. The latter had already broken groun [...]









Community
RXR Realty’s Scott Rechler Weighs in on New York Metropolitan Area’s Transportation Issues Summer 2017
MTA Board Member and RXR Realty Chairman and CEO Scott Rechler weighs in on a "summer of transportation hell" on Good Day NY.

Follow @rxr_realty on Instagram and @scottrechler on Twitter. [...]








The RXR platform manages 81 commercial real estate properties and investments with an aggregate gross asset value of approximately $15.4 billion as of March 31, 2017, comprising approximately 23.0 million square feet of commercial operating properties and approximately 3,200 multi-family and for sale units under active development in the New York Metropolitan area.







© 2017 RXR REALTY

Tenant Login | Contact | Careers | RXR on Instagram  | Disclaimer | Privacy Policy












































Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version
















RXR Asset Management LLC


















graypools
Sign in
Learn more







RXR Asset Management LLC
Fund Manager






Institutional Investors

Fund Managers

RXR Asset Management LLC





















RXR Asset Management LLC
is  a Delaware Fund Manager located in Uniondale,
New York.  
 

It was registered on Friday, March 30, 2012.






625 Rxr Plaza
Uniondale,
New York, 
11556 
United States
Phone: (516) 506-6000
http://www.rxrrealty.com



Chief Executive Officer
Scott Rechler
Chief Compliance Officer
Francis Sheehan
General Counsel
Jason Barnett
Chief Financial Officer
James Maturo




Inception Date2012-03-30
JurisdictionDelaware
Updated2017-06-20 19:47:49.027862
As of Date2017-03-30
Latest Filing2017-03-30
SEC Number801-73591
CRD Number158268
Inception2012-03-30
Legal NameRXR Asset Management LLC
NameRXR Asset Management LLC
Legal Entity TypeLimited Liability Company











Statements



Employees


Regulatory AUM






Funds



Real Estate Funds: 44












03-17
03-16
03-15




Employees
22.00
19.00
17.00











03-17
03-16
03-15




Regulatory Assets Under Management
3.41B
2.48B
1.88B







Real Estate Funds: 2017-03-30



RXR Real Estate Opportunity Fund II Parallel, L.P.
Delaware


RXR RE VAF - Fund III Parallel C LP
Delaware


RXR Real Estate Value Added Fund LP
Delaware


RXR Real Estate Value Added Fund Parallel LP
Delaware


RXR Real Estate Value Added Fund Parallel II LP
Delaware


RXR VAF 237 Park Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR Fund II 620 Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR Real Estate Value Added Fund Parallel II (REIT) LP
Delaware


RXR RE VAF - Fund III Parallel B (REIT) LP
Delaware


RXR Real Estate Opportunity Fund II, L.P.
Delaware


RXR Fund II SL Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR Real Estate Value Added Fund - Fund III LP
Delaware


RXR Fund II 340 Madison Co-Investor Holdings LP
Delaware


RXR Fund II 340 Madison Co-Investor II Holdings LP
Delaware


IP VAF III Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR Fund II 1166 Equity Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR VAF III 1285 Co-Investor Parallel LP
Delaware


RXR New York Metro Emerging Sub-Market Venture LP
Delaware


RXR EMF Larkin Tower Co-Investor LP
Delaware


IP VAF Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR VAF III 1285 Venture LP
Delaware


RXR Fund II 1166 Swap Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR New York Metro Emerging Sub-Market Venture Parallel II (REIT) LP
Delaware


IP EMF Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR RE VAF - Fund III Parallel B LP
Delaware


RXR New York Metro Emerging Sub-Market Venture Parallel LP
Delaware


RXR VAF III Ex Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR VAF III 1285 Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR VAF 32 Old Slip Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR RE VAF - Fund III Parallel A LP
Delaware


RXR VAF III 5TS Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR VAF 530 Fifth Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR EMF 9-47 Hall Street Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR EMF 810 Fulton Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR New York Metro Emerging Sub-Market Venture Parallel II LP
Delaware


RXR New York Metro Emerging Sub-Market Venture Parallel III LP
Delaware


RXR VAF III Ex Co-Investor Parallel LP
Delaware


RXR VAF 230 Park Venture Investor II JV LP
Delaware


RXR VAF 75 Rock Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR VAF 61 Broadway Co-Investor LP
Delaware


RXR Real Estate Value Added Fund Parallel III LP
Delaware


Hi USA RXR Tracker LLC
Delaware


RXR VAF 230 Park Venture Investor I JV LP
Delaware


RXR VAF 230 Park Co-Investor LP
Delaware
































About /
Entities /
Legal
© 2017 Graypools LLC










SEC FORM D




The Securities and Exchange Commission has not necessarily reviewed the information in this filing and has not determined if it is accurate and complete.The reader should not assume that the information is accurate and complete.



UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSIONWashington, D.C. 20549FORM DNotice of Exempt Offering of Securities


OMB APPROVAL


OMB Number:
3235-0076

Estimated average burden

hours per response:
4.00






1. Issuer's Identity


CIK (Filer ID Number)
Previous Names

X
None

Entity Type


0001688783




  
Corporation


X
Limited Partnership


  
Limited Liability Company


  
General Partnership


  
Business Trust


  
Other (Specify)





Name of Issuer
RXR RE VAF - Fund III Parallel C LP
Jurisdiction of Incorporation/Organization
DELAWARE
Year of Incorporation/Organization


  
Over Five Years Ago


X
Within Last Five Years (Specify Year)
2016


  
Yet to Be Formed



2. Principal Place of Business and Contact Information

Name of Issuer
RXR RE VAF - Fund III Parallel C LP

Street Address 1
Street Address 2

625 RXR PLAZA

City
State/Province/Country
ZIP/PostalCode
Phone Number of Issuer


UNIONDALE
NEW YORK
11556
516-506-6000


3. Related Persons


Last Name
First Name
Middle Name


Rechler
Scott


Street Address 1
Street Address 2

625 RXR Plaza

City
State/Province/Country
ZIP/PostalCode


Uniondale
NEW YORK
11556



Relationship:
X
Executive Officer
  
Director
  
Promoter

Clarification of Response (if Necessary):



Last Name
First Name
Middle Name


Barnett
Jason


Street Address 1
Street Address 2

625 RXR Plaza

City
State/Province/Country
ZIP/PostalCode


Uniondale
NEW YORK
11556



Relationship:
X
Executive Officer
  
Director
  
Promoter

Clarification of Response (if Necessary):



Last Name
First Name
Middle Name


Maturo
Michael


Street Address 1
Street Address 2

625 RXR Plaza

City
State/Province/Country
ZIP/PostalCode


Uniondale
NEW YORK
11556



Relationship:
X
Executive Officer
  
Director
  
Promoter

Clarification of Response (if Necessary):



Last Name
First Name
Middle Name


Rechler
Todd


Street Address 1
Street Address 2

625 RXR Plaza

City
State/Province/Country
ZIP/PostalCode


Uniondale
NEW YORK
11556



Relationship:
X
Executive Officer
  
Director
  
Promoter

Clarification of Response (if Necessary):



Last Name
First Name
Middle Name


Conniff
Richard


Street Address 1
Street Address 2

625 RXR Plaza

City
State/Province/Country
ZIP/PostalCode


Uniondale
NEW YORK
11556



Relationship:
X
Executive Officer
  
Director
  
Promoter

Clarification of Response (if Necessary):

4. Industry Group



  
Agriculture



Banking & Financial Services





  
Commercial Banking


  
Insurance


  
Investing


  
Investment Banking


X
Pooled Investment Fund





  
Hedge Fund


  
Private Equity Fund


  
Venture Capital Fund


X
Other Investment Fund





Is the issuer registered as an investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940? 




  
Yes
X
No



  
Other Banking & Financial Services




  
Business Services



Energy




  
Coal Mining





  
Electric Utilities





  
Energy Conservation





  
Environmental Services





  
Oil & Gas





  
Other Energy






Health Care




  
Biotechnology





  
Health Insurance





  
Hospitals & Physicians





  
Pharmaceuticals





  
Other Health Care



  
Manufacturing



Real Estate




  
Commercial





  
Construction





  
REITS & Finance





  
Residential





  
Other Real Estate





  
Retailing


  
Restaurants



Technology




  
Computers





  
Telecommunications





  
Other Technology




Travel




  
Airlines & Airports





  
Lodging & Conventions





  
Tourism & Travel Services





  
Other Travel



  
Other



5. Issuer Size










Revenue Range
OR
Aggregate Net Asset Value Range


  
No Revenues
  
No Aggregate Net Asset Value


  
$1 - $1,000,000
  
$1 - $5,000,000


  
$1,000,001 - $5,000,000
  
$5,000,001 - $25,000,000


  
$5,000,001 - $25,000,000
  
$25,000,001 - $50,000,000


  
$25,000,001 - $100,000,000
  
$50,000,001 - $100,000,000


  
Over $100,000,000
  
Over $100,000,000


  
Decline to Disclose
X
Decline to Disclose


  
Not Applicable
  
Not Applicable



6. Federal Exemption(s) and Exclusion(s) Claimed (select all that apply)



  
Rule 504(b)(1) (not (i), (ii) or (iii))


  
Rule 504 (b)(1)(i)


  
Rule 504 (b)(1)(ii)


  
Rule 504 (b)(1)(iii)


  
Rule 505


X
Rule 506(b)


  
Rule 506(c)


  
Securities Act Section 4(a)(5)




X
Investment Company Act Section 3(c)


X
Section 3(c)(1)
  
Section 3(c)(9)  


  
Section 3(c)(2)
  
Section 3(c)(10)


  
Section 3(c)(3)
  
Section 3(c)(11)


  
Section 3(c)(4)
  
Section 3(c)(12)


  
Section 3(c)(5)
  
Section 3(c)(13)


  
Section 3(c)(6)
  
Section 3(c)(14)


X
Section 3(c)(7)



7. Type of Filing


X
New Notice

Date of First Sale
2016-10-28

  
First Sale Yet to Occur


  
Amendment


8. Duration of Offering

Does the Issuer intend this offering to last more than one year?


X
Yes
  
No


9. Type(s) of Securities Offered (select all that apply)









  
Equity
X
Pooled Investment Fund Interests


  
Debt
  
Tenant-in-Common Securities


  
Option, Warrant or Other Right to Acquire Another Security
  
Mineral Property Securities


  
Security to be Acquired Upon Exercise of Option, Warrant or Other Right to Acquire Security
  
Other (describe)







10. Business Combination Transaction

Is this offering being made in connection with a business combination transaction, such as a merger, acquisition or exchange offer?


  
Yes
X
No


Clarification of Response (if Necessary):
11. Minimum Investment

Minimum investment accepted from any outside investor

$0

USD

12. Sales Compensation


Recipient

Recipient CRD Number
X
None




(Associated) Broker or Dealer
X
None


(Associated) Broker or Dealer CRD Number
X
None



Street Address 1
Street Address 2


City
State/Province/Country
ZIP/Postal Code



State(s) of Solicitation (select all that apply)Check “All States” or check individual States
  
All States


  
Foreign/non-US



13. Offering and Sales Amounts


Total Offering Amount

USD

or
X
Indefinite



Total Amount Sold

$75,000,000

USD


Total Remaining to be Sold

USD

or
X
Indefinite



Clarification of Response (if Necessary):
14. Investors


  
Select if securities in the offering have been or may be sold to persons who do not qualify as accredited investors, and enter the number of such non-accredited investors who already have invested in the offering.




Regardless of whether securities in the offering have been or may be sold to persons who do not qualify as accredited investors, enter the total number of investors who already have invested in the offering:
1


15. Sales Commissions & Finder's Fees Expenses
Provide separately the amounts of sales commissions and finders fees expenses, if any. If the amount of an expenditure is not known, provide an estimate and check the box next to the amount.


Sales Commissions

$0

USD

  
Estimate



Finders' Fees

$0

USD

  
Estimate



Clarification of Response (if Necessary):
16. Use of Proceeds
Provide the amount of the gross proceeds of the offering that has been or is proposed to be used for payments to any of the persons required to be named as executive officers, directors or promoters in response to Item 3 above. If the amount is unknown, provide an estimate and check the box next to the amount.



$0

USD

  
Estimate


Clarification of Response (if Necessary):
Signature and Submission
Please verify the information you have entered and review the Terms of Submission below before signing and clicking SUBMIT below to file this notice.
Terms of Submission

In submitting this notice, each issuer named above is:

Notifying the SEC and/or each State in which this notice is filed of the offering of 
                    securities described and undertaking to furnish them, upon written request, in the accordance with applicable
                    law, the information furnished to offerees.*
Irrevocably appointing each of the Secretary of the SEC and, the Securities Administrator 
                    or other legally designated officer of the State in which the issuer maintains its principal 
                    place of business and any State in which this notice is filed, as its agents for service of 
                    process, and agreeing that these persons may accept service on its behalf, of any notice, 
                    process or pleading, and further agreeing that such service may be made by registered or 
                    certified mail, in any Federal or state action, administrative proceeding, or arbitration 
                    brought against it in any place subject to the jurisdiction of the United States, if the 
                    action, proceeding or arbitration (a) arises out of any activity in connection with the 
                    offering of securities that is the subject of this notice, and (b) is founded, directly or 
                    indirectly, upon the provisions of:  (i) the Securities Act of 1933, the Securities Exchange 
                    Act of 1934, the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, the Investment Company Act of 1940, or the 
                    Investment Advisers Act of 1940, or any rule or regulation under any of these statutes, or (ii) 
                    the laws of the State in which the issuer maintains its principal place of business or any State 
                    in which this notice is filed.
Certifying that, if the issuer is claiming a Regulation D exemption for the offering, the issuer is not disqualified from relying on Regulation D for one of the reasons stated in Rule 505(b)(2)(iii) or Rule 506(d).


Each Issuer identified above has read this notice, knows the contents to be true, and has duly caused this notice to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned duly authorized person.
For signature, type in the signer's name or other letters or characters adopted or authorized as the signer's signature.


Issuer
Signature
Name of Signer
Title
Date


RXR RE VAF - Fund III Parallel C LP
/s/ Jason Barnett
Jason Barnett
Executive Vice President and Secretary
2016-11-15


Persons who respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB number.
* This undertaking does not affect any limits Section 102(a) of the National Securities Markets
        Improvement Act of 1996 ("NSMIA") [Pub. L. No. 104-290, 110 Stat. 3416 (Oct. 11, 1996)] imposes on the ability of States to
        require information. As a result, if the securities that are the subject of this Form D are "covered securities" for purposes 
        of NSMIA, whether in all instances or due to the nature of the offering that is the subject of this Form D, States cannot
        routinely require offering materials under this undertaking or otherwise and can require offering materials only to the
        extent NSMIA permits them to do so under NSMIA's preservation of their anti-fraud authority.









Limited Partnership Agreement Of Rxr Vaf Iii 1285 Co-investor Parallel Lp - Limited Partnership Agreement - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Limited Partnership Agreement     > LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT OF RXR VAF III 1285 CO-INVESTOR PARALLEL LP

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















Limited Partnership Agreement Of Rxr Vaf Iii 1285 Co-investor Parallel Lp
Limited Partnership Agreement



You are currently viewing:
 This Limited Partnership Agreement involves NORTHSTAR/RXR NEW YORK METRO REAL ESTATE, INC. | 1285 INVESTOR NT-NSR, LLC | RXR Realty LLC | RXR VAF III 1285 Co-Investor Parallel LP | RXR VAF III 1285 GP LP | RXR VAF III GP LLC. RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT OF RXR VAF III 1285 CO-INVESTOR PARALLEL LP Governing Law: Delaware      Date: 5/26/2016 Industry: Real Estate Operations        Sector: Services









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day










 
EXHIBIT 10.1


 


LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT

OF

RXR VAF III 1285 CO-INVESTOR PARALLEL LP

 

 

 

____________________________________________________________________________

 


THE INTERESTS ISSUED UNDER THIS AGREEMENT HAVE NOT BEEN REGISTERED
UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED (THE “SECURITIES
ACT”), OR REGISTERED OR QUALIFIED UNDER THE APPLICABLE STATE
SECURITIES LAWS, IN RELIANCE UPON EXEMPTIONS FROM REGISTRATION AND
QUALIFICATION PROVIDED IN THE SECURITIES ACT AND THE APPLICABLE
STATE SECURITIES LAWS, AND MAY NOT BE SOLD OR TRANSFERRED IN THE
ABSENCE OF AN EFFECTIVE REGISTRATION STATEMENT UNDER THE SECURITIES
ACT AND QUALIFICATION OR REGISTRATION UNDER THE APPLICABLE STATE
SECURITIES LAWS, OR AN OPINION OF COUNSEL SATISFACTORY TO THE
ISSUER THAT SUCH REGISTRATION OR QUALIFICATION IS NOT
REQUIRED.


IN ADDITION, THE INTERESTS ISSUED UNDER THIS AGREEMENT MAY BE SOLD
OR TRANSFERRED ONLY IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE RESTRICTIONS ON TRANSFER
SET FORTH HEREIN.

 

 


 
 
 
 

11585382.7




  


 















 




TABLE OF
CONTENTS



Page




ARTICLE
I


GENERAL
PROVISIONS



1




ARTICLE
II


CERTAIN
DEFINITIONS



2




ARTICLE
III


FINANCING



9




ARTICLE
IV


ALLOCATIONS OF
PROFITS AND LOSSES



13




ARTICLE
V


DISTRIBUTIONS



16




ARTICLE
VI


MANAGEMENT



17




ARTICLE
VII


MEETINGS



24




ARTICLE
VIII


BOOKS, RECORDS
AND BANK ACCOUNTS



24




ARTICLE
IX


ASSIGNABILITY
OF PARTNERSHIP INTERESTS; SALE OF THE INVESTMENT



27




ARTICLE
X


DISSOLUTION AND
TERMINATION



29




ARTICLE
XI


INTENTIONALLY
OMITTED



32




ARTICLE
XII


MISCELLANEOUS



32





 




 




 





Annex
A


Capital
Commitments, Initial Capital Contributions and Percentage
Interests



 





Annex
B


Right of First
Offer



 






 




 




 






 




 




 






 

 


 
 

11585382.7




  


 

 

LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT
 

OF
 

RXR VAF III 1285 CO-INVESTOR PARALLEL LP

 


LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT, (the “ Agreement
”) dated as of May 20, 2016, of RXR VAF III 1285 Co-Investor
Parallel LP, a Delaware limited partnership (the “
Partnership ”) having an address at c/o RXR
Realty LLC, 625 RXR Plaza, Uniondale, NY 11556, by and among RXR
VAF III 1285 GP LP, a Delaware limited partnership (the “
General Partner ”), and any persons admitted to
the Partnership in accordance with the terms of this Agreement as
limited partners (each, a “ Limited Partner
”). The Limited Partners of the Partnership and the General
Partner are hereinafter sometimes referred to collectively as the
“ Partners ” and each of them
individually as a “ Partner .” Certain
capitalized terms used herein are defined in Article II.

Background

 


WHEREAS, the General Partner formed the Partnership pursuant to the
provisions of the Delaware Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act,
as amended from time to time (the “ Act
”), by causing the Certificate of Limited Partnership of the
Partnership to be filed with the Delaware Secretary of State on May
18, 2016, pursuant to Section 17-201 of the Act (as may be amended
or restated from time to time hereafter, the “
Certificate of Limited Partnership
”);


WHEREAS, the Partnership will own certain indirect interests in the
real property commonly known as 1285 Avenue of the Americas (the
“ Investment ”); and


WHEREAS, the Partners desire to be admitted to the Partnership and
to set forth the terms, covenants and conditions governing or
pertaining to the Partnership, as hereinafter provided in this
Agreement.


NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the promises and the mutual
agreements herein contained and other good and valuable
consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby
acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
ARTICLE I 
 
GENERAL PROVISIONS


1.01. Formation of the Partnership . The Partners hereby
agree to form and maintain a Limited Partnership pursuant to the
Act and this Agreement. The General Partner shall have the
authority (i) to execute, file and record any amendments to, or
restatements of, the Certificate of Limited Partnership, any
fictitious name certificates and/or other documents to comply with
the laws of the State of Delaware, and any other jurisdiction in
which the Partnership shall carry on its business and (ii) to
designate and authorize any third party who need not be a Partner
of the Partnership to execute, file and record any such amendments,
restatements, certificates and/or other documents.

 


 
 

11585382.7




 


 



1.02. Name and Principal Office of the Partnership . The
Partnership shall be conducted under the name of RXR VAF III 1285
Co-Investor Parallel LP, or any other name the General Partner may
determine. Its principal office shall be located at c/o RXR Realty
LLC, 625 RXR Plaza, Uniondale, NY 11556, or at such other places
within the United States as the General Partner may
determine.


1.03. Business of the Partnership .


(a)    The business and purposes of the
Partnership shall be to (i) acquire, own, finance, refinance
and manage equity interests in RXR VAF III 1285 Vehicle LP, which
owns certain indirect interests in the Investment and (ii) do such
other acts as the General Partner may deem necessary or advisable
in connection with the foregoing.


(b)    In order to carry out the business and
purposes set forth in Section 1.03(a) hereof, the Partnership shall
have the power to do all and everything necessary, suitable or
proper for the accomplishment of or in furtherance of any of the
purposes set forth herein, and to do every other act or acts, thing
or things, incidental or appurtenant to or arising from or
connected with any of such purposes.


(c)    The Partnership shall not engage in any
business other than as provided in this Section 1.03.


1.04. Term of the Partnership . The term of the Partnership
(the “ Term ”) commenced effective upon
the filing of the Certificate of Limited Partnership of the
Partnership with the Delaware Secretary of State on May 18, 2016
and shall continue in full force and effect until the earlier
of:


(a)    the date that the Partnership is
dissolved in accordance with the provisions of Article X hereof;
and


(b)    the date of the sale or disposition of
the Investment.


1.05. Partners .


(a)    The General Partner of the Partnership
shall be RXR VAF III 1285 GP LP. Except as expressly provided in
this Agreement, no other Person shall be admitted as an additional
or substitute General Partner of the Partnership.


(b)    The Limited Partners of the Partnership
shall be listed in the books and records of the Partnership. Except
as expressly provided in this Agreement, no Person shall be
admitted as an additional or substitute Limited Partner of the
Partnership.
 
ARTICLE II 
 
CERTAIN DEFINITIONS


For purposes of this Agreement, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:


“Act” shall have the meaning set forth in the
Background Section.

 



2
 

11585382.7




 


 



“Adjusted Capital Account Deficit” shall mean, with
respect to any Partner, the deficit balance, if any, in such
Partner’s Capital Account as of the end of the relevant tax
year, after giving effect to the following adjustments:


(i)    credit to such Capital Account any
amounts which such Partner is obligated to restore pursuant to any
provision of this Agreement or is deemed to be obligated to restore
pursuant to Section 1.704-1(b)(2)(ii)(c) of the Regulations or
the penultimate sentences of Sections 1.704-2(g)(1) and (i)(5) of
the Regulations; and


(ii)    debit to such Capital Account the items
described in Sections 1.704-1(b)(2)(ii)(d)(4), (5) and (6) of the
Regulations.


The foregoing definition of “Adjusted Capital Account
Deficit” is intended to comply with the provisions of Section
1.704-1(b)(2)(ii)(d) of the Regulations and shall be interpreted
consistently therewith.


“Adjusted Capital Contributions” means, with respect to
each Partner, the total amount of Capital Contributions made by
such Partner pursuant to Sections 3.01, 3.02(a), 3.02(b), 3.02(c),
3.03 (excluding any Capital Contributions returned to existing
Limited Partners pursuant to such Section) and 10.02, less any Net
Distributable Cash and other amounts distributed to such Partner
pursuant to Section 5.01(a).


 “Affiliate” means, with reference to a Person,
(i) any Person directly or indirectly Controlling, Controlled by or
under common Control with such Person, (ii) any Person owning or
controlling ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding voting
securities or beneficial interests of such Person, (iii) any
officer, director, partner, manager, general trustee or anyone
acting in a substantially similar capacity as to such Person; and
(iv) any Person who is an officer, director, general partner,
trustee, or holder of ten percent (10%) or more of the voting
securities or beneficial interests of any of the foregoing;
provided that any separate investment account, feeder fund,
alternative investment vehicle or similar Person that is managed by
the General Partner or its Affiliates shall not be considered an
Affiliate of the General Partner or its Affiliates in any
circumstance or for any purpose under this Agreement in which the
determination as to any action, decision or vote to be effected is
actually made or approved by the Person or Persons who are not
themselves the General Partner or an Affiliate of the General
Partner (without regard to whether such action, decision or vote to
be effected is actually effected by the General Partner or its
Affiliate); provided further that 1285 Investor NT-NSR, LLC shall
not be considered an Affiliate of RXR for purposes of this
Agreement.


“Agreement” means this Limited Partnership Agreement of
the Partnership, as may be amended or restated in accordance with
the terms hereof.


 “Authorized Representative” shall have the
meaning set forth in Section 12.12(a).


“Budget Act” means the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015
(P.L. 114-74).


“Business Day” shall mean any day other than (a)
Saturday or Sunday and (b) any other day on which banks
located in New York City are required or authorized by law to
remain closed.

 



3
 

11585382.7




 


 



“Capital Account” shall mean an account for each
Partner which shall consist of its initial Capital Contribution to
the Partnership as described in Section 3.01 hereof, and shall be
increased by:


(a)    the amount of additional cash or other
property (net of liabilities assumed by the Partnership and
liabilities to which such contributed property is subject)
contributed, or deemed to be contributed, by such Partner to the
Partnership in accordance with this Agreement; and


(b)    the amount of Profit and other items of
income and gain allocated to such Partner pursuant to
Article IV hereof;

and shall be decreased by :


(c)    the amount of Loss and other items of
deduction or loss allocated to such Partner pursuant to
Article IV hereof;


(d)    the amount of cash distributed to such
Partner in accordance with this Agreement; and


(e)    the fair market value of property other
than cash distributed to such Partner (net of liabilities assumed
by such Partner and liabilities to which such distributed property
is subject).


The Capital Account of each Partner shall be further adjusted as
set forth in this Agreement. No Partner shall be required to
restore any negative balance in its Capital Account except as
otherwise provided herein. In the event that all or a portion of a
Partnership Interest in the Partnership is transferred in
accordance with the terms of this Agreement, the transferee shall
succeed to the Capital Account of the transferor to the extent it
relates to the transferred Partnership Interest.

“Capital Call Notice” shall have the meaning set forth
in Section 3.02(a).


“Capital Commitment” means, with respect to any
Partner, the capital commitment of such Partner set forth on
Annex A hereto, as the same may be amended from time to
time.


“Capital Contributions” means the contributions made to
the Partnership by the Partners in respect of their Capital
Commitments.


 “Certificate of Limited Partnership” shall have
the meaning set forth in the Background Section.


“Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended from time to time.


“Company Act” shall have the meaning set forth in
Section 9.01(a)(ii).


“Continuing Liability” shall have the meaning set forth
in Section 10.02(a).


“ 
Control” means the power to direct or cause the direction of
the management or policies of a company whether through ownership
of securities, by contract or otherwise, and
“Controlling” and “Controlled” shall be
interpreted accordingly.

 



4
 

11585382.7




 


 



“Defaulting Partner” shall have the meaning set forth
in Section 3.02(c).


“Due Date” shall have the meaning set forth in Section
3.02(b).


“ERISA” means the Employee Retirement Income Security
Act of 1974, as amended.


“Event of Dissolution” shall have the meaning set forth
in Section 10.01(a).


“Event of Withdrawal” means, with respect to any
Partner, the death, incapacity, dissolution, expulsion, withdrawal,
insolvency or bankruptcy of such Partner. For the purposes of this
Agreement, the “bankruptcy” of a Partner shall be
deemed to occur only (i) when the Partner shall file a voluntary
petition in bankruptcy, or shall be adjudicated bankrupt or
insolvent, or shall file any petition or answer seeking for itself
any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment,
liquidation, dissolution or similar relief under any present or
future statute, law or regulation, or shall file any answer
admitting (or shall fail to contest) the material allegations of
petition filed against such entity in any such proceeding or shall
seek or consent to or acquiesce in the judicial appointment of any
trustee, fiscal agent, receiver or liquidator of such entity or of
all or any substantial part of its properties or shall take any
action looking to its dissolution or liquidation; or (ii) if,
within sixty (60) days after the commencement of an action against
the Partner seeking any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement,
composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution or similar
relief under any present or future statute, law or regulation, such
action shall not have been dismissed or all orders or proceedings
thereunder affecting the operations or the business of such entity
stayed, or if the stay of any such order or proceeding thereafter
shall be set aside, or if, within sixty (60) days after the
judicial appointment without the consent or acquiescence of such
entity of any trustee, fiscal agent, receiver or liquidator of such
entity or of all or any substantial part of its properties, such
appointment shall not have been vacated. For purposes of this
Agreement, the “insolvency” of a Partner shall be
deemed to occur only when the Partner shall make an assignment for
the benefit of creditors or shall admit in writing that its assets
are insufficient to pay its liabilities as they come
due.


“Excess Nonrecourse Liability” means an “excess
nonrecourse liability” within the meaning of Section 1.752-3
(a) (3) of the Regulations.


“Fiscal Year” shall have the meaning set forth in
Section 8.01.


“Fund General Partner” means the general partner of the
VAF III Partnerships.


“General Partner” shall have the meaning set forth in
the first paragraph hereof.


“Gross Asset Value” means, with respect to any asset,
the asset’s adjusted basis for federal income tax purposes,
except as follows:


(i)    the initial Gross Asset Value of any
asset contributed by a Partner to the Partnership shall be the
gross fair market value of such asset at the time of such
contribution as reasonably determined by the General
Partner;


(ii)    the Gross Asset Values of all
Partnership assets may, in the sole discretion of the General
Partner, be adjusted to equal their respective gross fair market
values, as reasonably determined by the General Partner, as of the
following times: (a)

 



5
 

11585382.7




 


 



the acquisition of an additional interest in the Partnership by any
new or existing Partner in exchange for more than a de minimis
Capital Contribution; (b) the distribution by the Partnership to a
Partner of more than a de minimis amount of Partnership property as
consideration for an interest in the Partnership; (c) the grant of
an interest in the Partnership (other than a de minimis interest)
as consideration for the provision of services to or for the
benefit of the Partnership by an existing Partner acting in a
Partner capacity, or by a new Partner acting in a Partner capacity,
or in anticipation of becoming a Partner; and (d) the liquidation
of the Partnership within the meaning of Section
1.704-1(b)(2)(ii)(g) of the Regulations;


(iii)    the Gross Asset Value of any
Partnership asset distributed to any Partner shall be the gross
fair market value of such asset on the date of distribution, as
reasonably determined by the General Partner; and


(iv)    the Gross Asset Values of Partnership
assets shall be increased (or decreased) to reflect any adjustments
to the adjusted basis of such assets pursuant to Code Section
734(b) or Code Section 743(b), but only to the extent that such
adjustments are taken into account in determining Capital Accounts
pursuant to Section 1.704-1(b)(2)(iv)(m) of the Regulations and
Article V hereof; provided , however , that Gross
Asset Values shall not be adjusted pursuant to this clause (iv) to
the extent the General Partner determines that an adjustment
pursuant to clause (ii) above is necessary or appropriate in
connection with a transaction that would otherwise result in an
adjustment pursuant to this clause (iv).


If the Gross Asset Value of an asset has been determined or
adjusted pursuant to clause (i), (ii) or (iv) above, such Gross
Asset Value shall thereafter be adjusted in the same manner as
would the asset’s adjusted basis for federal income tax
purposes, except that depreciation deductions shall be computed
based on the asset’s Gross Asset Value as so determined,
rather than on its adjusted tax basis.


“Indemnitees” shall have the meaning set forth in
Section 6.03(a).


“Initial Closing Date” means May 20, 2016.


“Investment” shall have the meaning set forth in the
Background Section.


“Limited Partner” shall have the meaning set forth in
the first paragraph hereof.


“Majority (or other specified percentage) in Interest of the
Limited Partners” means, at any time, those Limited Partners
(excluding Defaulting Partners) having Percentage Interests in the
aggregate in excess of fifty percent (50%) (or other specified
percentage) of the aggregate Percentage Interests of all the
Limited Partners (excluding Defaulting Partners) in the
Partnership.

 


“Modifications” shall have the meaning set forth in
Section 6.01(e)(iv).


“Net Distributable Cash” shall mean the sum of :
(w) the Partnership’s share of cash distributions which
the Partnership receives from its interest in the Investment or any
other of the Partnership’s assets and holdings (including any
amounts released from Partnership Reserves), together with any net
proceeds or other cash from the financing, refinancing or sale of
its interest in the Investment or any Partnership Affiliate, or
from any other source, and (x) any income earned

 



6
 

11585382.7




 


 



on its cash holdings from temporary investments, reduced by
the sum of: (y) any expenses and liabilities incurred by the
Partnership and (z) any amounts added to Reserves. “Net
Distributable Cash” shall not be reduced by depreciation,
amortization, cost recovery deductions or similar non-cash
allowances.


“Non-Defaulting Partner” shall have the meaning set
forth in Section 3.02(c).


“Nonrecourse Debt” means any Partnership liability to
the extent that no Partner or related person bears the economic
risk of loss for such liability under Section 1.752-2 of the
Regulations.


“Nonrecourse Deductions” shall be determined as set
forth in Section 1.704-2 (b) (1) of the Regulations.


“Nonrecourse Liability” shall have the meaning set
forth in Section 1.704-2(b)(3) of the Regulations.


“Notice Date” shall have the meaning set forth in
Section 3.02(b).


“Partner” or “Partners” shall have the
meaning in the first paragraph hereof.


“Partner Nonrecourse Debt” shall have the meaning set
forth in Section 1.704-2 (b) (4) of the Regulations.


“Partner Nonrecourse Debt Minimum Gain” shall be
determined as set forth in Section 1.704-2 (i) (2) of the
Regulations, and, as provided therein, shall generally be the
amount, with respect to each Partner Nonrecourse Debt, equal to the
Partnership Minimum Gain that would result if such Partner
Nonrecourse Debt were treated as a Nonrecourse Debt.


“Partner Nonrecourse Deductions” shall be determined in
the manner set forth in Section 1.704-2 (i) (1) of the
Regulations.


“Partnership” shall have the meaning set forth in the
first paragraph hereof.


“Partnership Interest” means, with respect to each
Partner, its total economic interest in the Partnership as a
Partner, including its right to receive distributions of Net
Distributable Cash and allocations of Profit and Loss in accordance
with this Agreement.


“Partnership Minimum Gain” shall be determined as set
forth in Section 1.704-2 (b) (2) of the Regulations.


“Percentage Interest” means, as to each Partner, the
percentage determined by dividing (i) the total Capital
Contributions made by such Partner to the Partnership pursuant to
the terms of this Agreement, by (ii) an amount equal to the
total Capital Contributions made by all of the Partners to the
Partnership pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, provided that,
for the avoidance of doubt, capital contributions shall exclude any
Priority Capital Contributions.


“Person” means a corporation, an association, a
partnership (general or limited), a joint venture, an estate, a
trust, a limited liability company, a limited liability
partnership, any other legal entity, or an individual.

 



7
 

11585382.7




 


 



“Principal” means any of Scott Rechler, Michael Maturo
or Jason Barnett (collectively,
“Principals”).


“Priority Capital Contribution” shall have the meaning
set forth in Section 3.02(g).


“Profits” and “Losses” mean, for each
taxable year or other period, an amount equal to the
Partnership’s taxable income or loss for such year or period,
determined in accordance with Code Section 703(a) (for this
purpose, all items of income, gain, loss or deduction required to
be stated separately pursuant to Code Section 703(a)(1) shall be
included in taxable income or loss), with the following
adjustments:

(i)    any income of the Partnership that is
exempt from federal income tax and not otherwise taken into account
in computing Profits and Losses shall be added to such taxable
income or loss;

(ii)    any expenditures of the Partnership
described in Code Section 705(a)(2)(B) or treated as Code Section
705(a)(2)(B) expenditures pursuant to Section 1.704-1(b)(2)(iv)(i)
of the Regulations, and not otherwise taken into account in
computing Profits or Losses shall be subtracted from such taxable
income or loss;

(iii)    if the Gross Asset Value of any
Partnership asset is adjusted pursuant to clause (ii), (iii) or
(iv) of the definition of Gross Asset Value herein, the amount of
such adjustment shall be taken into account as gain or loss from
the disposition of such asset for purposes of computing Profits or
Losses;

(iv)    gain or loss resulting from any
disposition of Partnership property with respect to which gain or
loss is recognized for federal income tax purposes shall be
computed by reference to the Gross Asset Value of the property
disposed of, notwithstanding that the adjusted tax basis of such
property differs from its Gross Asset Value;

(v)    depreciation or other cost recovery
deductions shall be computed based upon the Gross Asset Values of
the Partnership’s assets rather than upon such assets’
adjusted bases for U.S. federal income tax purposes; and

(vi)    notwithstanding any other provisions
hereof, any items which are specially allocated pursuant to Article
IV hereof shall not be taken into account in computing Profits or
Losses.


“Records” shall have the meaning set forth in Section
8.03(a).


“Regulations” means regulations, proposed regulations,
and temporary regulations promulgated under the Code from time to
time.


“Removal Event” shall have the meaning set forth in
Section 6.02(b).


“Reserves” means any reserves established or increased
for the payment of Partnership expenses or liabilities, in such
amounts and for such reasons as reasonably determined by the
General Partner.

 



8
 

11585382.7




 


 



“RXR” means RXR Realty LLC, a Delaware limited
liability company, and its successors whether by way of merger,
business combination, sale of assets, reincorporation,
consolidation, recapitalization, liquidation, amalgamation or
similar transaction or otherwise.


“Security Instruments” shall have the meaning set forth
in Section 6.01(e)(iii).


“Subsequent Closing” means a closing which occurs after
the date hereof at which any existing Partner increases its Capital
Commitment, or any additional Limited Partner is admitted to the
Partnership in respect of a Capital Commitment.


“Tax Distributions” shall have the meaning set forth in
Section 5.04.


“Term” shall have the meaning set forth in Section
1.04.


“Transfers” shall have the meaning set forth in Section
9.01(a).


“VAF III Partnership Agreements” means, collectively,
the operating agreements of the VAF III Partnerships.


“VAF III Partnerships” means, collectively, RXR Real
Estate Value Added Fund – Fund III LP, RXR RE VAF –
Fund III Parallel A LP, RXR RE VAF – Fund III Parallel B LP
and RXR RE VAF – Fund III Parallel B (REIT) LP.


“Withdrawing Partner” shall have the meaning set forth
in Section 9.02.
 
ARTICLE III 
 
FINANCING


3.01. Capital Commitments and Initial Capital Contributions of
the Partners .


(a)    The General Partner’s Capital
Commitment and initial Capital Contribution are set forth on
Annex A to this Agreement.


(b)    The names of the initial Limited
Partners and their respective Capital Commitments and initial
Capital Contributions are set forth on Annex A to this
Agreement.


3.02. Additional Capital Contributions; Loans


(a)    Within 10 Business Days after written
notice from the General Partner (a “ Capital Call
Notice ”), the Partners shall (i) be required to fund
additional Capital Contributions in satisfaction of their
respective Capital Commitments, proportionately in relation to each
Partner’s unfunded Capital Commitment and (ii) to the extent
the General Partner is requesting additional Capital Contributions
that would result in a Partner making aggregate Capital
Contributions in excess of such Partner’s Capital Commitment,
have the option to fund such requested additional Capital
Contribution. The General Partner may deliver Capital Call Notices
for operating expenses, liabilities or other obligations of the
Partnership.


(b)    If any Partner fails to contribute the
full amount of any additional Capital Contributions required to be
made pursuant to Section 3.02(a)(i) on or prior to the date
on

 



9
 

11585382.7




 


 



which the additional Capital Contributions are required to be made
(the “ Due Date ”), but
contributes its full share within ten (10) days after the date
notice is given to such Partner of that failure (the “
Notice Date ”), such Partner
shall also pay to the Partnership in addition to such additional
Capital Contribution, an amount equal to the sum of (A) an amount
equivalent to interest for the period beginning with the Due Date
and ending with the date such contribution is made by such Partner
at a rate equal to fifteen percent (15%) per annum, not to exceed
the maximum amount permitted by law, during such period on the full
amount contributed, and (B) any additional actual out-of-pocket
costs required to be paid or incurred directly or indirectly by the
Partnership as a result of that Partner’s failure to make
such additional Capital Contributions on or prior to the Due
Date.


(c)    If any Partner fails to contribute the
full amount of any additional Capital Contributions required to be
made pursuant to Section 3.02(a)(i), within ten (10) days after the
Notice Date, the General Partner may elect, in its sole discretion,
that such Partner shall be a Defaulting Partner (the “
Defaulting Partner ”) as of that tenth day, in
which case, the General Partner may elect to exercise one or more
of the following remedies with respect to such Defaulting
Partner:


(i)    Such Defaulting Partner shall forfeit
all of its voting, approval and similar rights under this
Agreement.


(ii)    The General Partner shall have the
right, on behalf of the Partners other than the Defaulting Partner
(the “ Non - Defaulting
Partners ”), exercisable by notice from the
General Partner to the Defaulting Partner to cause the Partnership
to pursue any available legal remedies against the Defaulting
Partner to collect the additional Capital Contributions and any
other damages (including consequential damages).


(iii)    The General Partner shall have the
right to lend (or to permit another Person to lend), to the
Defaulting Partner the amount of such additional Capital
Contribution that was not made timely by the Defaulting Partner,
the proceeds of which loan are to be paid to the Partnership on
behalf of the Defaulting Partner as an additional Capital
Contribution by the Defaulting Partner. Any loan under this clause
(iii) shall be a recourse loan to the Defaulting Partner, and shall
bear interest, compounded monthly, at the rate equal to twenty
percent (20%) per annum, not to exceed the maximum interest rate
permitted by law, from the Due Date until the date of repayment.
Repayment of any such loan by the Defaulting Partner shall be
effected by causing the Partnership to pay directly to the Persons
who shall have made the loan, all distributions otherwise payable
to the Defaulting Partner under this Agreement as and when payable,
instead of making such distributions to the Defaulting Partner
(with such distributions being deemed for all purposes to have been
made to the Defaulting Partner and then paid by the Defaulting
Partner to the Persons who shall have made the loan). Any payments
made with respect to the foregoing loans shall first be applied to
accrued but unpaid interest, and then be deemed a repayment of
principal. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this clause
(iii), the Defaulting Partner shall be personally liable for the
payment of interest and the repayment of principal on any such loan
contemplated by this clause (iii).


(iv)    The General Partner shall have the
right to cause the Percentage Interest, Capital Commitment,
Adjusted Capital Contribution and Capital Account of such
Defaulting Partner to be reduced to zero (or to such other amount
as determined by the General Partner) and to reallocate the balance
in such Capital Account

 



10
 

11585382.7




 


 



to the Capital Accounts of all other Partners pro rata in
accordance with their Percentage Interests.


(d)    Intentionally Omitted.


(e)    The provisions of this Section 3.02 are
not intended to be for the benefit of any creditor or other Person
(other than a Partner) to whom any debts, liabilities or
obligations are owed by, or who otherwise has any claim against,
the Partnership or any of the Partners; and no such creditor or
other Person shall obtain any right under any such provision or by
reason of any such liability, obligation or otherwise against the
Partnership or any of the Partners. No Partner shall be required to
make any loans or Capital Contributions to the Partnership other
than as provided for in Section 3.01, Section 10.02 and this
Section 3.02.


(f)    Subject to Section 5.05 and Section
10.02, or as otherwise required by law, no Partner shall be
required to return any distributions received by such Partner from
the Partnership. No Partner shall have the right to withdraw any
part of his Capital Contributions, or receive any distribution or
consideration for the fair value of its Partnership Interest,
except as specifically provided in this Agreement. Except as
specifically provided in this Agreement, no time has been agreed
upon for the return of any Partner's Capital Contributions. No
Partner shall at any time withdraw from the Partnership except as
expressly provided in this Agreement. No Partner shall receive
interest on its Capital Contribution to the Partnership. At no time
during the term of the Partnership or upon dissolution and
liquidation thereof shall any Partner with a negative balance in
its Capital Account have any obligation to the Partnership or the
other Partners to eliminate or restore such negative
balance.


(g)    If, under the terms of any loan to the
Partnership or any entity established by the Partnership for the
purpose of acquiring or owning an Investment, any Principal or an
Affiliate thereof is required to make any payments under any
guarantees, indemnity agreements or other Investment loan documents
not attributable to personal actions of the Principal outside the
scope of the General Partner’s authority in this Agreement,
and giving rise to liability under any guaranty, indemnity, or
similar agreement executed by the Principal or an Affiliate
thereof, then each such payment shall be deemed to be a “
Priority Capital Contribution ” made by the
General Partner to the Partnership; provided, however, that prior
to any Principal or Affiliate making any such Priority Capital
Contribution, the Partnership shall request that the Limited
Partners fund any such payment pro rata in accordance with their
Percentage Interests, and a Priority Capital Contribution shall
only be made in the amount that has not been so funded by the
Limited Partners; provided further, that if the General Partner
determines in its reasonable discretion that the payment is
required to be funded in a time frame that would not permit the
General Partner to call additional Capital Contributions while
enabling the Principal or Affiliate to comply with its obligations
under the applicable agreement, the Principal or Affiliate may make
such Priority Capital Contribution and subsequently request that
the Limited Partners reimburse the Principal or Affiliate for such
Priority Capital Contribution, in which case, the amount so
reimbursed shall not be entitled to the preferred return described
in the following sentence. Unpaid Priority Capital Contributions
shall be entitled to a ten percent (10%) preferred return thereon,
compounded annually, which return shall be treated as a guaranteed
payment within the meaning of Section 707(c) of the Code. Priority
Capital Contributions and the preferred return thereon may only be
paid out of Net Distributable Cash, to the extent it is available,
and before any other distributions of Net Distributable Cash are
made pursuant to Section 5.01. In the event that any Priority
Capital Contributions are deemed to have been made pursuant to this
Section 3.02(g), then, notwithstanding the provisions of
Article

 



11
 

11585382.7




 


 



V, Net Distributable Cash shall first be distributed to the General
Partner until it receives, pursuant to this Section 3.02(g), an
amount equal to its Priority Capital Contributions together with
the preferred return accrued thereon. Priority Capital
Contributions shall not increase the General Partner’s
Percentage Interest and therefore shall not dilute the Percentage
Interests of the Limited Partners. Promptly after any Priority
Capital Contribution is made, the General Partner shall give
written notice to the Advisory Committee of such Priority Capital
Contribution.


3.03. Admission of Additional Partners . If the Partnership
requires additional funds in excess of the Limited Partners’
Capital Commitments, the General Partner shall request such funds
from the Limited Partners, pro rata based on their Percentage
Interests; provided that the Limited Partners shall have no
obligation to make any additional Capital Contributions in excess
of their Capital Commitments. If, after making a request for funds
in excess of the Capital Commitments of the Limited Partners as
provided in the previous sentence, the Limited Partners have
declined to fund such excess in full, and the General Partner
determines that additional funds are needed, the General Partner,
in its sole discretion, shall have the right, subject to Section
9.01(e), to admit additional Partners to the Partnership, or to
permit an existing Partner to increase its Capital Commitment, in
one or more Subsequent Closings without the consent of the Partners
in accordance with the terms of this Section 3.03. The Partners
hereby consent to such admission of the additional Partners and/or
the increase in the Capital Commitment of other existing Partners
after the date hereof and agree to take all reasonable actions
requested by the General Partner to effectuate the same. Unless
there has been a material change or significant events relating to
an Investment which would justify an increased valuation in the
reasonable determination of the General Partner, such Partner
participating in a Subsequent Closing will (A) remit to the
Partnership upon such admission or increase an amount equal to the
product of (i) a fraction, the numerator of which equals the
additional Partner’s Capital Commitment or the increase in
the existing Partner’s Capital Commitment, as the case may
be, and the denominator of which equals the Capital Commitments of
all Partners (including the Capital Commitments of all additional
Partners and the increase in Capital Commitments of all existing
Partners) and (ii) all Adjusted Capital Contributions (and after
taking into account any Capital Contributions previously returned
to the Partners pursuant to this Agreement and any contributions or
distributions pursuant to this Section 3.03), and (B) make an
additional contribution (which shall not be deemed a Capital
Contribution), calculated in the same manner as interest, on the
amounts described in clause (A) of this sentence at an annual rate
equal to ten percent (10%) calculated from the date on which
Capital Contributions would have been made if such Partner had been
admitted to the Partnership on the date hereof or in the case of a
Partner increasing its Capital Commitment, such Capital Commitment
had been made on the date hereof. Capital Contributions and the
additional contributions made by Partners admitted at a Subsequent
Closing may be paid to existing Limited Partners pro rata in
accordance with their Adjusted Capital Contributions immediately
prior to the Subsequent Closing. Capital Contributions made
pursuant to clauses (A) and (B) of this Section 3.03 shall be made
in satisfaction of the Capital Commitments of the contributing
Limited Partners, and the Capital Contributions and other amounts
contributed pursuant to clauses (A) and (C) of this Section 3.03
shall be paid to existing Limited Partners pro rata in accordance
with their Adjusted Capital Contributions. Capital Contributions
made pursuant to clause (A) of this Section 3.03(i) and paid
pursuant hereto to a Partner will be added to the unfunded Capital
Commitment of the receiving Partners and will be subject to recall
as a Capital Contribution pursuant to the terms hereof. If, in
connection with either the admission of Partners after the date
hereof or an increase in a Partner’s Capital Commitment after
the date hereof, an additional amount is paid to and a portion of a
Capital Contribution is returned to a Limited Partner, it shall be
treated for all purposes (other than for tax purposes) as if such
capital had never been contributed.

 



12
 

11585382.7




  


 



ARTICLE IV 
 
ALLOCATIONS OF PROFITS AND LOSSES


4.01. Losses . Except as otherwise provided in this Article
IV, Losses of the Partnership for each taxable year (or portion
thereof) shall be allocated as follows:


(a)    first, to the Partners that have
received an allocation of Profits pursuant to Section 4.02(b), in
the same ratio as such prior allocations, in an amount sufficient
to reverse such prior allocations, and in the reverse of the
chronological order in which such prior allocations were made;
and


(b)    second, to the Partners, pro
rata in accordance with their respective Percentage
Interests.


4.02. Profits . Except as otherwise provided in this Article
IV, Profits of the Partnership for each taxable year (or portion
thereof) shall be allocated as follows:


(a)    first, to the Partners proportionately
in an amount equal to (i) the cumulative Losses allocated pursuant
to Section 4.01(b) to each such Partner over (ii) the cumulative
Profits allocated pursuant to this Section 4.02(a) to each such
Partner for all prior taxable years (or portions thereof);
and


(b)    second, remaining Profits shall be
allocated to each Partner in an amount such that Profits, on an
aggregate basis since the inception of the Partnership, are
proportionate to the distributions (other than distributions that
represent repayment of Priority Capital Contributions and the
preferred return thereon or Capital Contributions) that such
Partner received or would receive as of the end of such taxable
year (or other period) if all of the Partnership’s Profits
(determined on an aggregate basis since the inception of the
Partnership) consisted of Net Distributable Cash that was
distributed as of such year-end pursuant to Article V (other
than Section 5.01(a) and less any actual distributions made
pursuant to Article V).


4.03. Special Allocations .


(a)     Partnership Minimum Gain
Chargeback . Notwithstanding anything contained in this Article
IV to the contrary, if there is a net decrease in Partnership
Minimum Gain during any taxable year (or other period), except as
otherwise permitted by Sections 1.704-2(f)(2), (3), (4) and (5) of
the Regulations, items of Partnership income and gain for such
taxable year (and subsequent years, if necessary) in the order
provided in Section 1.704-2(j)(2)(i) of the Regulations shall be
allocated among all Partners whose shares of Partnership Minimum
Gain decreased during that year in proportion to and to the extent
of such Partner’s share of the net decrease in Partnership
Minimum Gain during such year. The allocation contained in this
Section 4.03(a) is intended to be a minimum gain chargeback within
the meaning of Section 1.704-2 of the Regulations, and shall be
interpreted consistently therewith.


(b)     Partnership Nonrecourse Debt Minimum
Gain Chargeback . Notwithstanding anything contained in Article
IV to the contrary, if there is a net decrease in Partner
Nonrecourse Debt Minimum Gain during any taxable year (or other
period), except as provided in Section 1.704-2(i) of the
Regulations, items of Partnership income and gain for such taxable
year (and subsequent years, if necessary) in the order provided in
Section 1.704-2(j)(2)(ii) of the

 



13
 

11585382.7




 


 



Regulations shall be allocated among all Partners whose share of
Partner Nonrecourse Debt Minimum Gain decreased during that year in
proportion to and to the extent of such Partner’s share of
the net decrease in Partner Nonrecourse Debt Minimum Gain during
such year. This Section 4.03(b) is intended to comply with the
minimum gain chargeback requirement in Section 1.704-2 of the
Regulations and shall be interpreted consistently therewith. Excess
Nonrecourse Liabilities shall be allocated among the Partners in
accordance with their Percentage Interests.


(c)     Loss Limitation .
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 4.03, the
amount of items of Partnership expense and loss allocated pursuant
to this Section 4.03 to any Partner shall not exceed the maximum
amount of such items that can be so allocated without causing such
Partner (other than the General Partner) to have an Adjusted
Capital Account Deficit at the end of any taxable year (or other
period). All such items in excess of the limitation set forth in
this Section 4.03(c) shall be allocated first to Partners who would
not have an Adjusted Capital Account Deficit, pro rata, until no
Partner would be entitled to any further allocation, and thereafter
to the General Partner.


(d)     Qualified Income Offset .
Notwithstanding any provisions of Article IV to the contrary, in
the event any Partner unexpectedly receives any adjustments,
allocations, or distributions described in Sections
1.704-1(b)(2)(ii)(d)(4), 1.704-1(b)(2)(ii)(d)(5), or
1.704-1(b)(2)(ii)(d)(6) of the Regulations, items of Partnership
income and gain (including gross income) shall be specially
allocated to each such Partner in an amount and manner sufficient
to eliminate, to the extent required by the Regulations, the
Adjusted Capital Account Deficit of such Partner as quickly as
possible, provided that an allocation pursuant to this
Section 4.03(d) shall be made only if and to the extent that such
Partner would have an Adjusted Capital Account Deficit. The
allocation contained in this Section 4.03(d) is intended to be a
“qualified income offset” within the meaning of Section
1.704-1(b)(2)(ii)(d) of the Regulations, and shall be subject
thereto.


(e)     Ordering . Sections 4.03(a),
(b), (c) and (d) hereof shall be applied in the order provided in
Section 1.704-2 of the Regulations.


(f)     Section 754 Election Adjustments
. To the extent that an adjustment to the adjusted tax basis of any
Partnership asset pursuant to Code Section 734(b) or 743(b) is
required, pursuant to Section 1.704-1(b)(2)(iv)(m) of the
Regulations, to be taken into account in determining Capital
Accounts, the amount of such adjustment to the Capital Accounts
shall be treated as an item of gain (if the adjustment increases
the basis of the asset) or loss (if the adjustment decreases such
basis) and such gain or loss shall be specially allocated to the
Partners in a manner consistent with the manner in which their
Capital Accounts are required to be adjusted pursuant to such
section of the Regulations.


(g)     Nonrecourse Deductions .
Nonrecourse Deductions for any Fiscal Year or other period shall be
allocated in accordance with Section 4.01(b).


(h)     Partner Nonrecourse Deductions .
In accordance with Section 1.704-2(i)(1) of the Regulations, any
item of Partnership loss or deduction which is attributable to
Partner Nonrecourse Debt for which a Partner bears the economic
risk of loss (such as a non-recourse loan made by a Partner to the
Partnership or an otherwise non-recourse loan to the Partnership
that has been guaranteed by a Partner) shall be allocated to that
Partner to the extent of its economic risk of loss.

 



14
 

11585382.7




 


 



(i)     Varying Interests . If, in
accordance with the terms of Section 9.01, a Partner sells or
exchanges its interest in the Partnership or otherwise is admitted
as a substituted Partner, Profits and Losses shall be allocated
between the transferor and the transferee in accordance with
Section 9.01(d).


(j)     Intent of Allocations;
Modification . It is intended that prior to a distribution of
the proceeds from a liquidation of the Partnership pursuant to
Section 10.01 hereof, the positive Capital Account balance of each
Partner shall be equal to the amount that such Partner is entitled
to receive pursuant to such Section. Accordingly, notwithstanding
anything to the contrary in this Article IV, to the extent
permissible under Sections 704(b) of the Code and the Regulations
promulgated thereunder, Profits and Losses and, if necessary, items
of gross income and gross deductions, of the Partnership for the
year of liquidation of the Partnership (or, if earlier, the year in
which all or substantially all of the is assets are sold,
transferred or disposed of) shall be allocated among the Partners
so as to bring the positive Capital Account balance of each Partner
as close as possible to the amount that such Partner is entitled to
receive pursuant to Section 10.01.


4.04. Tax Allocations: Code Section 704(c) .


(a)    For federal income tax purposes, except
as otherwise provided in Section 4.04(b), each item of income,
gain, loss and deduction shall be allocated among the Partners in
the same manner as its corresponding item of book income, gain,
loss or deduction is allocated pursuant to this
Article IV.


(b)    In accordance with Section 704(c) of the
Code and the Regulations thereunder, income, gain, loss and
deduction with respect to any property contributed to the capital
of the Partnership shall, solely for tax purposes, be allocated
among the Partners under any reasonable method selected by the
General Partner so as to take account of any variation between the
adjusted basis of such property to the Partnership for federal
income tax purposes and its initial Gross Asset Value.


If the Gross Asset Value of any Partnership asset is adjusted
pursuant to clause (ii) or (iv) of the definition thereof,
subsequent allocations of income, gain, loss and deduction with
respect to such asset shall take account of any variation between
the adjusted basis of such asset for federal income tax purposes
and its Gross Asset Value in the same manner as under Code Section
704(c) and the Regulations thereunder.


Any elections or other decisions relating to such allocations shall
be made by the General Partner in a manner that reasonably reflects
the purpose and intention of this Agreement. Allocations pursuant
to this Section 4.04(b) are solely for purposes of federal, state
and local taxes and shall not affect, or in any way be taken into
account in computing, any Partner’s Capital Account or share
of Profits, Losses, other items or distributions pursuant to any
provision of this Agreement


(c)    The provisions of this Article IV (and
other related provisions in this Agreement) pertaining to the
allocation of items of Partnership income, gain, loss, deductions,
and credits shall be interpreted consistently with the Regulations,
and to the extent unintentionally inconsistent with such
Regulations, shall be deemed to be modified to the extent necessary
to make such provisions consistent with the Regulations.

 



15
 

11585382.7




  


 



ARTICLE V 
 
DISTRIBUTIONS


5.01. Distributions of Net Distributable Cash . Subject to
the other provisions of this Article V, Net Distributable Cash, if
any, for each Fiscal Year or part thereof (after deducting
therefrom, and paying, to the extent of such available funds, any
unreturned Priority Capital Contributions and preferred returns
thereon) shall initially be apportioned among the Partners in
accordance with their respective Percentage Interests and shall be
distributed quarterly to the Partners. If there is a change in the
Percentage Interests of any of the Partners during any period in
which Net Distributable Cash has been received by the Partnership,
such distributions shall be made to the Partners in a manner
reasonably determined by the General Partner which takes into
account the varying interests of the Partners during such period,
using an interim closing of the books method.


5.02. Distributions in Kind .


(a)    No Partner has a right to any
distribution in any form other than cash.


(b)    The Partnership may not make a
distribution in kind unless approved by both the General Partner
and the Partner receiving the in-kind distribution.


5.03. Limitations on Distributions . No distribution shall
be made to the Partners if such distribution would violate the
Act.


5.04. Intentionally Omitted .


5.05. Withholding .


(a)    The General Partner may withhold and pay
over to the Internal Revenue Service (or any other relevant taxing
authority) such amounts as the Partnership is required to withhold
or otherwise pay, pursuant to the Code or any other applicable law,
on account of a Partner's allocable share of the Partnership's
items of gross income, income, gain, or other attributes for tax
purposes.


(b)    For purposes of this Agreement, any
taxes so withheld or any taxes paid over by the Partnership or
otherwise incurred directly or indirectly, including under Section
6225 of the Code as amended by the Budget Act, with respect to a
Partner's allocable share of the Partnership's gross income,
income, gain or other attributes for tax purposes, or amounts which
are otherwise properly allocable to a Partner, shall be deemed to
be a distribution or payment to such Partner, reducing the amount
otherwise distributable to such Partner pursuant to this Agreement
and reducing the Capital Account of such Partner. If the
Partnership or the General Partner itself pays or incurs any tax
(including penalties or interest) or similar charge directly or
indirectly in respect of any Partner, including under Section 6225
of the Code as amended by the Budget Act, or pays or incurs any
amount (including any tax, penalties or interest) in respect of any
failure to pay or withhold any tax or similar charge in respect of
any Partner as required by applicable law directly or indirectly
that is not withheld from distribution to such Partner, such
Partner shall on demand reimburse the Partnership for such amounts
plus interest thereon (accruing from the date such payment was made
by the person entitled to reimbursement) at the rate of fifteen
percent (15%) per annum, compounded quarterly on the first day of
each calendar quarter, from

 



16
 

11585382.7




 


 



and after the date on which the Partnership has given notice to
such Partner. Such reimbursement shall not constitute a Capital
Contribution and shall not reduce such Partner’s unfunded
Capital Commitment. In addition to all other rights and remedies of
the General Partner or the Partnership at law or in equity with
respect to amounts owed by a Partner to the Partnership pursuant to
this Section 5.05(b), the General Partner shall have the right to
offset, or cause to be offset, against any such Partner’s
distributions under this Agreement all amounts owed by such Partner
to the General Partner or the Partnership pursuant to this Section
5.05(b). A Partner’s reimbursement obligation arising under
this Section 5.05(b) prior to a transfer by such Partner of its
Percentage Interest in the Partnership or a withdrawal by such
Partner shall continue after such transfer or withdrawal.

  
A Partner’s reimbursement obligation arising under this
Section 5.05(b) with respect to taxes withheld, paid over, or
otherwise incurred directly or indirectly by the Partnership (i)
pursuant to Section 6225 of the Code or (ii) that are so withheld,
paid over, or otherwise incurred directly or indirectly by the
Partnership prior to the termination of the Partnership shall
survive the dissolution and termination of the
Partnership.    


(c)    The General Partner shall not be
obligated to apply for or obtain a reduction of or exemption from
withholding tax on behalf of any Partner that may be eligible for
such reduction or exemption. To the extent that a Partner claims to
be entitled to a reduced rate of, or exemption from, a withholding
tax pursuant to an applicable income tax treaty, or otherwise, the
Partner shall furnish the General Partner with such information and
forms as such Partner may be required to complete where necessary
to comply with any and all laws and regulations governing the
obligations of withholding tax agents. Each Partner will fully
comply with any reasonable requests for information from the
General Partner with regard to any withholding tax. Each Partner
represents and warrants that any information and forms furnished by
such Partner pursuant to this Section 5.05(c) shall be true and
accurate and agrees to indemnify the Partnership and each of the
Partners from any and all d


 








 












 























	Moody's: WBCMT 2007-C30 and WBCMT 2007-C31 Unaffected by the Proposed Non-Permitted Equity Transfer Request of Five Times Square





































Yes
No





























About Moody'sCareersRegulatory AffairsTerms of UseContact UsAbout Moody'sCompany OverviewInvestor RelationsMedia RelationsCorporate Social ResponsibilityAlumni













GO






































There are too many sessions currently in use on this account















Log In




Cancel


































Research & Ratings

OverviewRatings NewsRating MethodologiesRatings DisclosuresRatings PerformanceRegulatory AffairsCode of Professional ConductSector in DepthLook Up a RatingFind an AnalystInteractive ChartsMarket SegmentCorporatesFinancial InstitutionsStructured FinanceManaged InvestmentsInfrastructure & Project FinanceSovereign & SupranationalSub-SovereignU.S. Public FinanceRegionNorth AmericaLatin America & CaribbeanEurope, Middle East & AfricaAsia PacificResearch TypeIssuer ResearchIndustry / Sector ResearchMethodologyCapital Markets ResearchDefault & Ratings AnalyticsEconomic ResearchData ReportsPolitical / Economic GroupEmerging MarketsEuropean UnionAsia-Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC)Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN)Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS)EurozoneGulf Cooperation CouncilMercosurOrganisation for Economic Co-operation and Development  (OECD)Credit PolicyRating MethodologiesRequests for CommentThe Commercial GroupHow to Get RatedRatings DefinitionsRatings Policy & Approach



Products & Solutions

OverviewProducts Listing by A - ZMoody's AnalyticsMoody's Pricing & Valuations ToolsMoody's Advisory ServicesMoody's Economy.comMoody’s Training & CertificationSolutionsAsset and Liability Management SolutionsCredit Origination SolutionsCredit Risk SolutionsData SolutionsEconomic SolutionsInsurance SolutionsInvestment & Pensions SolutionsLearning Solutions and CertificationsPortfolio Management SolutionsRegulatory and Accounting SolutionsStructured Finance SolutionsAccess ProductsCredit Risk CalculatorCredit Transition ModelCredit TrendsCreditEdge®Default Recovery Database (DRD)Default Risk Service - StructuredFund MonitoringLossCalc™Market Implied Ratings (MIR®)Moody's Financial Metrics™Moody's Project Finance ScorecardMoody's Quantitative Ratings Estimator (QRATE)Municipal Financial Ratio AnalysisRatings InteractiveRiskCalc™



News & Events

OverviewRatings NewsEventsTraining EventsTopics





Log In
Register







            Log In 

            Please log in for full access to your permissions. Password is case sensitive.











                    User Name:





                    Password:









                Automatically log me in when I return





                Log In





                Forgot your Username or Password?




        Or Log In using:

























Please Note


We brought you to this page based on your search query. If this isn't what you are looking for, you can continue to Search Results for ""
















The maximum number of items you can export is 3,000.
  Please reduce your list by using the filtering tool to the left.









Close








































































Back to Previous Page






















Email Research
Recipient email addresses will not be used in mailing lists or redistributed.







 

Recipient'sEmail



Use semicolon to separate each address, limit to 20 addresses.




Enter thecharacters you see




Can't read?  Try a new set








Send


Cancel






















Email Research
Thank you for your interest in sharing Moody's Research. You have reached the daily limit of  Research email sharings.


OK










Thank you!
You have successfully sent the research.
				Please note: some research requires a paid subscription in order to access.


OK


























                                    Export PDF
                                







                                    Export CSV
                                







                                    Email
                                





                                    Print
                                






























Related Issuers













Wachovia Bank Commercial Mortgage Trust 2007-C30






Wachovia Bank Commercial Mortgage Trust 2007-C31











        Related Research
    






Rating Action: Moody's Upgrades Eight CMBS IO Classes, Downgrades 243 CMBS IO Classes and Withdraws 51 CMBS IO Classes from 294 US and Canadian CMBS Deals following the Implementation of Updated Structured Finance Interest-Only Methodology





Rating Action: Moody's Upgrades Two and Affirms 16 Classes of WBCMT 2007-C31





Rating Action: Moody's Upgrades Two, Affirms Fifteen and Downgrades Two Classes of WBCMT 2007-C30





Announcement: Moody's: WBCMT 2007-C31 Ratings Unaffected by Proposed Defeasance of the Ashford Hospitality Pool 1 and Ashford Hospitality Pool 2 Loans





Announcement: Moody's: WBCMT 2007-C31 Unaffected by the Proposed Non-Permitted Equity Transfer Requests












Announcement: Moody's: WBCMT 2007-C30 and WBCMT 2007-C31 Unaffected by the Proposed Non-Permitted Equity Transfer Request of Five Times Square






                    Global Credit Research - 29 Dec 2015
                









New York, December 29, 2015 -- Moody's Investors Service (Moody's) was informed that the principals of 
5TS Acquisition LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, 
have requested the transfer of a 49% managing member interest in 
the indirect owner of the Five Times Square borrower to RXR VAF III 5TS 
Investor LP, an affiliate of RXR Realty LLC. As part of the 
transaction RXR Real Estate Value Added Fund -- Fund III LP, 
RXR RE VAF -- Fund III Parallel A LP, RXR RE VAF -- Fund 
III Parallel B LP and RXR RE VAF -- Fund III Parallel B (REIT) LP 
(collectively, the "RXR Guarantors"), will be 
added as a Guarantor/Indemnitor for the non-recourse carve outs 
and environmental indemnities and the Five Times Square borrower will 
change its name from Square Acquisition LLC to RXR 5TS Owner LLC.




Moody's has reviewed the proposed transaction and determined that this 
action will not in, and of itself at this point in time result in 
the downgrade or withdrawal of the current ratings, for any class 
of certificates, including the classes which remain on review for 
possible downgrade or upgrade, rated by Moody's in Wachovia Bank 
Commercial Mortgage Trust, Commercial Mortgage Pass-Through 
Certificates, Series 2007-C30 and/or Wachovia Bank Commercial 
Mortgage Trust, Commercial Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates, 
Series 2007-C31. Moody's press release dated November 
12, 2015 placed several classes on review in WBCMT 2007-C30 
and WBCMT 2007-C31:




https://www.moodys.com/research/Moodys-Places-Seven-Classes-on-Review-for-Possible-Upgrade-for--PR_338856 
and


https://www.moodys.com/research/Moodys-Places-Nine-Classes-on-Review-for-Possible-Upgrade-and--PR_338830.




Moody's opinion addresses only the credit impact associated with the proposed 
amendment, and Moody's is not expressing any opinion as to whether 
the amendment has, or could have, other non-credit 
related effects that may have a detrimental impact on the interests of 
holders of rated obligations and/or counterparties.




Moody's will continue monitoring the ratings. Any change in the 
ratings will be publicly disseminated by Moody's through appropriate media.


This publication does not announce a credit rating action. For 
any credit ratings referenced in this publication, please see the 
ratings tab on the issuer/entity page on www.moodys.com 
for the most updated credit rating action information and rating history.




Matthew Halpern
Asst Vice President - Analyst
Structured Finance Group
Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
250 Greenwich Street
New York, NY 10007
U.S.A.
JOURNALISTS: 212-553-0376
SUBSCRIBERS: 212-553-1653


Gregory Reed
VP - Senior Credit Officer
Structured Finance Group
JOURNALISTS: 212-553-0376
SUBSCRIBERS: 212-553-1653


Releasing Office:
Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
250 Greenwich Street
New York, NY 10007
U.S.A.
JOURNALISTS: 212-553-0376
SUBSCRIBERS: 212-553-1653


Moody's: WBCMT 2007-C30 and WBCMT 2007-C31 Unaffected by the Proposed Non-Permitted Equity Transfer Request of Five Times Square




No Related Data.











                    © 2017 Moody’s Corporation, Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., Moody’s Analytics, Inc. and/or their licensors and affiliates (collectively, “MOODY’S”). All rights reserved. CREDIT RATINGS ISSUED BY MOODY'S INVESTORS SERVICE, INC. AND ITS RATINGS AFFILIATES (“MIS”) ARE MOODY’S CURRENT OPINIONS OF THE RELATIVE FUTURE CREDIT RISK OF ENTITIES, CREDIT COMMITMENTS, OR DEBT OR DEBT-LIKE SECURITIES, AND MOODY’S PUBLICATIONS MAY INCLUDE MOODY’S CURRENT OPINIONS OF THE RELATIVE FUTURE CREDIT RISK OF ENTITIES, CREDIT COMMITMENTS, OR DEBT OR DEBT-LIKE SECURITIES. MOODY’S DEFINES CREDIT RISK AS THE RISK THAT AN ENTITY MAY NOT MEET ITS CONTRACTUAL, FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS AS THEY COME DUE AND ANY ESTIMATED FINANCIAL LOSS IN THE EVENT OF DEFAULT. CREDIT RATINGS DO NOT ADDRESS ANY OTHER RISK, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO: LIQUIDITY RISK, MARKET VALUE RISK, OR PRICE VOLATILITY. CREDIT RATINGS AND MOODY’S OPINIONS INCLUDED IN MOODY’S PUBLICATIONS ARE NOT STATEMENTS OF CURRENT OR HISTORICAL FACT. MOODY’S PUBLICATIONS MAY ALSO INCLUDE QUANTITATIVE MODEL-BASED ESTIMATES OF CREDIT RISK AND RELATED OPINIONS OR COMMENTARY PUBLISHED BY MOODY’S ANALYTICS, INC. CREDIT RATINGS AND MOODY’S PUBLICATIONS DO NOT CONSTITUTE OR PROVIDE INVESTMENT OR FINANCIAL ADVICE, AND CREDIT RATINGS AND MOODY’S PUBLICATIONS ARE NOT AND DO NOT PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS TO PURCHASE, SELL, OR HOLD PARTICULAR SECURITIES. NEITHER CREDIT RATINGS NOR MOODY’S PUBLICATIONS COMMENT ON THE SUITABILITY OF AN INVESTMENT FOR ANY PARTICULAR INVESTOR. MOODY’S ISSUES ITS CREDIT RATINGS AND PUBLISHES MOODY’S PUBLICATIONS WITH THE EXPECTATION AND UNDERSTANDING THAT EACH INVESTOR WILL, WITH DUE CARE, MAKE ITS OWN STUDY AND EVALUATION OF EACH SECURITY THAT IS UNDER CONSIDERATION FOR PURCHASE, HOLDING, OR SALE. MOODY’S CREDIT RATINGS AND MOODY’S PUBLICATIONS ARE NOT INTENDED FOR USE BY RETAIL INVESTORS AND IT WOULD BE RECKLESS AND INAPPROPRIATE FOR RETAIL INVESTORS TO USE MOODY’S CREDIT RATINGS OR MOODY’S PUBLICATIONS WHEN MAKING AN INVESTMENT DECISION. IF IN DOUBT YOU SHOULD CONTACT YOUR FINANCIAL OR OTHER PROFESSIONAL ADVISER. ALL INFORMATION CONTAINED HEREIN IS PROTECTED BY LAW, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, COPYRIGHT LAW, AND NONE OF SUCH INFORMATION MAY BE COPIED OR OTHERWISE REPRODUCED, REPACKAGED, FURTHER TRANSMITTED, TRANSFERRED, DISSEMINATED, REDISTRIBUTED OR RESOLD, OR STORED FOR SUBSEQUENT USE FOR ANY SUCH PURPOSE, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, IN ANY FORM OR MANNER OR BY ANY MEANS WHATSOEVER, BY ANY PERSON WITHOUT MOODY’S PRIOR WRITTEN CONSENT. All information contained herein is obtained by MOODY’S from sources believed by it to be accurate and reliable. Because of the possibility of human or mechanical error as well as other factors, however, all information contained herein is provided “AS IS” without warranty of any kind. MOODY'S adopts all necessary measures so that the information it uses in assigning a credit rating is of sufficient quality and from sources MOODY'S considers to be reliable including, when appropriate, independent third-party sources. However, MOODY’S is not an auditor and cannot in every instance independently verify or validate information received in the rating process or in preparing the Moody’s publications. To the extent permitted by law, MOODY’S and its directors, officers, employees, agents, representatives, licensors and suppliers disclaim liability to any person or entity for any indirect, special, consequential, or incidental losses or damages whatsoever arising from or in connection with the information contained herein or the use of or inability to use any such information, even if MOODY’S or any of its directors, officers, employees, agents, representatives, licensors or suppliers is advised in advance of the possibility of such losses or damages, including but not limited to: (a) any loss of present or prospective profits or (b) any loss or damage arising where the relevant financial instrument is not the subject of a particular credit rating assigned by MOODY’S. To the extent permitted by law, MOODY’S and its directors, officers, employees, agents, representatives, licensors and suppliers disclaim liability for any direct or compensatory losses or damages caused to any person or entity, including but not limited to by any negligence (but excluding fraud, willful misconduct or any other type of liability that, for the avoidance of doubt, by law cannot be excluded) on the part of, or any contingency within or beyond the control of, MOODY’S or any of its directors, officers, employees, agents, representatives, licensors or suppliers, arising from or in connection with the information contained herein or the use of or inability to use any such information. NO WARRANTY, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, AS TO THE ACCURACY, TIMELINESS, COMPLETENESS, MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PARTICULAR PURPOSE OF ANY SUCH RATING OR OTHER OPINION OR INFORMATION IS GIVEN OR MADE BY MOODY’S IN ANY FORM OR MANNER WHATSOEVER. Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., a wholly-owned credit rating agency subsidiary of Moody’s Corporation (“MCO”), hereby discloses that most issuers of debt securities (including corporate and municipal bonds, debentures, notes and commercial paper) and preferred stock rated by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. have, prior to assignment of any rating, agreed to pay to Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. for appraisal and rating services rendered by it fees ranging from $1,500 to approximately $2,500,000. MCO and MIS also maintain policies and procedures to address the independence of MIS’s ratings and rating processes. Information regarding certain affiliations that may exist between directors of MCO and rated entities, and between entities who hold ratings from MIS and have also publicly reported to the SEC an ownership interest in MCO of more than 5%, is posted annually at www.moodys.com under the heading “Investor Relations — Corporate Governance — Director and Shareholder Affiliation Policy.” Additional terms for Australia only: Any publication into Australia of this document is pursuant to the Australian Financial Services License of MOODY’S affiliate, Moody’s Investors Service Pty Limited ABN 61 003 399 657AFSL 336969 and/or Moody’s Analytics Australia Pty Ltd ABN 94 105 136 972 AFSL 383569 (as applicable). This document is intended to be provided only to “wholesale clients” within the meaning of section 761G of the Corporations Act 2001. By continuing to access this document from within Australia, you represent to MOODY’S that you are, or are accessing the document as a representative of, a “wholesale client” and that neither you nor the entity you represent will directly or indirectly disseminate this document or its contents to “retail clients” within the meaning of section 761G of the Corporations Act 2001. MOODY’S credit rating is an opinion as to the creditworthiness of a debt obligation of the issuer, not on the equity securities of the issuer or any form of security that is available to retail investors. It would be reckless and inappropriate for retail investors to use MOODY’S credit ratings or publications when making an investment decision. If in doubt you should contact your financial or other professional adviser. Additional terms for Japan only: Moody's Japan K.K. (“MJKK”) is a wholly-owned credit rating agency subsidiary of Moody's Group Japan G.K., which is wholly-owned by Moody’s Overseas Holdings Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of MCO. Moody’s SF Japan K.K. (“MSFJ”) is a wholly-owned credit rating agency subsidiary of MJKK. MSFJ is not a Nationally Recognized Statistical Rating Organization (“NRSRO”). Therefore, credit ratings assigned by MSFJ are Non-NRSRO Credit Ratings. Non-NRSRO Credit Ratings are assigned by an entity that is not a NRSRO and, consequently, the rated obligation will not qualify for certain types of treatment under U.S. laws. MJKK and MSFJ are credit rating agencies registered with the Japan Financial Services Agency and their registration numbers are FSA Commissioner (Ratings) No. 2 and 3 respectively. MJKK or MSFJ (as applicable) hereby disclose that most issuers of debt securities (including corporate and municipal bonds, debentures, notes and commercial paper) and preferred stock rated by MJKK or MSFJ (as applicable) have, prior to assignment of any rating, agreed to pay to MJKK or MSFJ (as applicable) for appraisal and rating services rendered by it fees ranging from JPY200,000 to approximately JPY350,000,000. MJKK and MSFJ also maintain policies and procedures to address Japanese regulatory requirements.


















Back to Previous Page



















Moody's Integrity Hotline
EU

001-800-506-1440
Japan

KDDI: 00-539-111 then 888-320-1668
NTT: 0034-811-001 then 888-320-1668
Outside of the EU and Japan

1-866-330-MDYS (6397)



Browse By
HomeResearch & RatingsProducts & SolutionsNews & EventsCareers


Contact Us
Help & SupportContact UsSubmit a Complaint


Terms & Conditions
Terms of UsePrivacy PolicyProprietary Rights





            © 2017 Moody's Investors Service, Inc., Moody’s Analytics, Inc. and/or their affiliates and licensors. All rights reserved.
        

           Regional Sites:
            
GlobalArgentinaAsiaAustraliaBoliviaBrazilCanadaCEEChinaCzech RepublicCISEMEAFranceGermanyIndonesiaIndiaItalyJapanKoreaMexicoMiddle EastPolandSouth AfricaSpainTurkeyTaiwanUruguay







































Limited Partnership Agreement, Limited Partnership Contracts - Free Legal Documents (page 1 Of 47)

















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Limited Partnership Agreement    

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents













SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>








Limited Partnership Agreements 





	These Limited Partnership Agreements are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their clients. Use them for competitive intelligence, drafting documents or to get information about transactions within a particular industry or sector. We have millions of legal documents and clauses that you can search for free.	



1) AMENDMENT NO. 5 TO FIRST AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF SUNOCO LP March 30, 2017Parties: SUNOCO LP | Sunoco GP LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
2) AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIPParties: HOSPITALITY INVESTORS TRUST, INC. | American Realty Capital Hospitality Advisors, LLC | American Realty Capital Hospitality Grace Portfolio, LLC | American Realty Capital Hospitality Operating Partnership, LP | American Realty Capital Hospitality Properties, LLC | American Realty Capital Hospitality Special Limited Partnership, LLC | BROOKFIELD STRATEGIC REAL ESTATE PARTNERS II HOSPITALITY REIT II LLC | BSREP II HOSPITALITY II SPECIAL GP OP LLC | Crestline Hotels  Resorts, LLC | HOSPITALITY INVESTORS TRUST OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, LP | HOSPITALITY INVESTORS TRUST, INC | Initial Preferred LP | Revised Uniform Limited Partnership 
								
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
3) NESTOR PARTNERS AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIPParties: NESTOR PARTNERS | All Limited Partners | Millburn Ridgefield Corporation | New Jersey Uniform Limited Partnership 
								
								Document Date: 3/29/2017

4) AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO THE AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF BENEFIT STREET PARTNERS REALTY OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.PParties: BENEFIT STREET PARTNERS REALTY TRUST, INC. | BENEFIT STREET PARTNERS REALTY OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, LP | Benefit Street Partners Realty Trust LP, LLC | Benefit Street Partners Realty Trust, Inc | BSP LIMITED 
								
								Document Date: 3/29/2017

5) AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIPParties: AMERICAN MIDSTREAM PARTNERS, LP | American Midstream GP, LLC | Magnolia Infrastructure Holdings, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
6) BioSig Technologies Announces Strategic Partnership with Mayo Clinic Ten-year agreement provides know-how, intellectual property development and clinical resources to commercialize the PURE EP? System and develop future technologiesParties: BIOSIG TECHNOLOGIES, INC. | BioSig Technologies Announces Strategic Partnership | BioSig Technologies, Inc | PURE EP(tm) System 
								
								Document Date: 3/17/2017

7) AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF ROYAL HAWAIIAN ORCHARDS, L.PParties: ROYAL HAWAIIAN ORCHARDS, L.P. | 827 Fort Street, Honolulu, Hawaii 96813 Any Limited | Mauna Loa Resources, Inc | ML Resources, Inc | ROYAL HAWAIIAN ORCHARDS, LP 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
8) AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO FOURTH AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF JP ENERGY PARTNERS LPParties: JP ENERGY PARTNERS LP | American Midstream GP, LLC | American Midstream, LLC, American Midstream Partners, LP | Argo Merger GP Sub, LLC | New Limited 
								
								Document Date: 3/14/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
9) FIRST AMENDMENT TO THE THIRD AMENDED AND RESTATED LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT OF BREITBURN ENERGY PARTNERS LPParties: BREITBURN ENERGY PARTNERS LP | Breitburn GP LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/8/2017

10) FOURTH AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF JP ENERGY PARTNERS LPParties: JP ENERGY PARTNERS LP | American Midstream GP, LLC | American Midstream Partners, LP | Argo Merger GP Sub, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/8/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
11) AMENDMENT NO. 3 TO FIFTH AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF AMERICAN MIDSTREAM PARTNERS, LPParties: AMERICAN MIDSTREAM PARTNERS, LP | American Midstream GP, LLC | HIGHPOINT INFRASTRUCTURE PARTNERS, LLC | MAGNOLIA INFRASTRUCTURE PARTNERS, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/8/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
12) FIFTH AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF NATURAL RESOURCE PARTNERS L.PParties: NATURAL RESOURCE PARTNERS LP | GP Natural Resource Partners LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/6/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
13) FIFTH AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF INDEPENDENCE REALTY OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, LPParties: INDEPENDENCE REALTY TRUST, INC | Corporate/Limited Liability Company Additional Limited | Empire American Realty Operating Partnership, LP | INDEPENDENCE REALTY OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, LP | Individual Additional Limited | INITIAL LIMITED PARTNERS | IRT Limited Partner, LLC | Revised Uniform Limited Partnership 
								
								Document Date: 3/3/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
14) AMENDMENT NO. 2 TO THE SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT OF PJT PARTNERS HOLDINGS LPParties: PJT PARTNERS INC. | PJT Partners Holding LP | PJT PARTNERS HOLDINGS LP | PJT PARTNERS INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
15) FIRST AMENDMENT TO THIRD AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF MPLX LPParties: MPLX LP | MPLX GP LLC 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
16) THIRD AMENDED  RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF SPECTRA ENERGY PARTNERS (DE) GP, LP A Delaware Limited PartnershipParties: SPECTRA ENERGY PARTNERS, LP | SPECTRA ENERGY PARTNERS (DE) GP, LP | Spectra Energy Partners GP, LLC | Spectra Energy Southeast Pipeline Corporation | Spectra Energy Transmission, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
17) FIRST AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF EPD PUBCO UNIT I L.PParties: ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L P | All Class B Limited Partners | ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS COMPANY | EPCO HOLDINGS, INC | EPD PUBCO UNIT I LP | Original Partnership 
								Law Firm: Vinson Elkins;Andrews Kurth
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
18) FIRST AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF EPD PRIVCO UNIT I L.PParties: ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L P | All Class B Limited Partners | ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS COMPANY | EPCO HOLDINGS, INC | EPD PRIVCO UNIT I LP | Original Partnership 
								Law Firm: Vinson Elkins;Andrews Kurth
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
19) FIRST AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF EPD PUBCO UNIT III L.PParties: ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS PARTNERS L P | All Class B Limited Partners | ENTERPRISE PRODUCTS COMPANY | EPCO HOLDINGS, INC | EPD PUBCO UNIT III LP | Original Partnership 
								Law Firm: Vinson Elkins;Andrews Kurth
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
20) AMENDMENT NO. 2 TO THE SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF WESTERN GAS PARTNERS, LPParties: WESTERN GAS PARTNERS LP | Western Gas Holdings, LLC | WESTERN GAS PARTNERS, LP 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
21) AMENDED AND RESTATED LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENTParties: TANGER FACTORY OUTLET CENTERS INC | Tanger LP | TANGER PROPERTIES LIMITED PARTNERSHIP 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:North Carolina
22) COMPOSITE AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF WILLIAMS PARTNERS L.P. (as amended as of July 24, 2012, December 20, 2012, January 29, 2015, February 2, 2015, June 10, 2015, September 28, 2015, October 12, 2016, and January 9, 2017)Parties: WILLIAMS PARTNERS L.P. | Williams Partners GP LLC | WILLIAMS PARTNERS LP 
								
								Document Date: 2/22/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
23) FOURTH AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF CHENIERE ENERGY PARTNERS, L.PParties: CHENIERE ENERGY PARTNERS, L.P. | All Limited Partners | Cheniere Energy Partners GP, LLC | CHENIERE ENERGY PARTNERS, LP 
								
								Document Date: 2/21/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
24) AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT OF AMERICAN FINANCE OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.PParties: AMERICAN FINANCE TRUST, INC | America, Inc, American Realty Capital Retail Operating Partnership, LP | American Finance Operating Partnership, LP | American Realty Capital Retail Advisor, LLC | Genie Acquisition, LLC | Lincoln Retail REIT Services, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 2/21/2017

25) FOURTH AMENDED AND RESTATED LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENTParties: CERES TACTICAL MACRO L.P. | Ceres Managed Futures LLC 
								
								Document Date: 2/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
26) AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIPParties: KIMBELL ROYALTY PARTNERS, LP | KIMBELL ROYALTY GP, LLC | Organizational Limited | RIVERCREST ROYALTIES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 2/14/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
27) LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT OF MATRIX LAS CIENEGAS, A CALIFORNIA LIMITED PARTNERSHIPParties: ROYALE ENERGY HOLDINGS, INC. | JJM Transportation Corporation | Revised Limited Partnership | Secretary JJM Transportation Corp 
								
								Document Date: 2/14/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
28) AMENDED  RESTATED LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT Matrix Investments, L.P. A CALIFORNIA LIMITED PARTNERSHIPParties: ROYALE ENERGY HOLDINGS, INC. | AMENDED  RESTATED LIMITED PARTNERSHIP | GROVES INVESTMENTS CORPORATION | Hot Springs Rach Corp | JORDAN ENTERPRISES LIMITED PARTNERSHIP | JRS ENERGY INVESTMENTS, LLC | Matrix Investments, LP | Matrix Oil Management Corporation | MEETEETSE LIMITED PARTNERSHIP | OVE Inc | PEM Management Corporation | PEM RESOURCES LIMITED PARTNERSHIP | Revised Limited Partnership | Sugar Shack Enterprises LLC | Walou Corp 
								
								Document Date: 2/14/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
29) LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT Matrix Permian Limited Partnership, LP A TEXAS LIMITED PARTNERSHIPParties: ROYALE ENERGY HOLDINGS, INC. | Matrix Partnership Management Corporation | Matrix Permian Limited Partnership, LP 
								
								Document Date: 2/14/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
30) FIRST AMENDMENT TO FIRST AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF INLAND RESIDENTIAL OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.PParties: INLAND RESIDENTIAL PROPERTIES TRUST, INC. | Inland Real Estate Investment Corporation | INLAND RESIDENTIAL OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, LP | INLAND RESIDENTIAL PROPERTIES TRUST SPECIAL LIMITED PARTNER, LLC | INLAND RESIDENTIAL PROPERTIES TRUST, INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/2/2017

31) AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF SANCHEZ PRODUCTION PARTNERS LPParties: SANCHEZ PRODUCTION PARTNERS LP | Sanchez Production Partners GP LLC 
								
								Document Date: 1/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
32) ADOPTION OF THIRD ADDENDUM TO FIRST AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF PREIT ASSOCIATES, L.P. DESIGNATING THE RIGHTS, OBLIGATIONS, DUTIES AND PREFERENCES OF SERIES C PREFERRED UNITS January 27, 2017Parties: PENNSYLVANIA REAL ESTATE INVESTMENT TRUST | Pennsylvania Real Estate | PREIT Associates, LP | State Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 1/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Pennsylvania
33) EIGHTH AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF ENBRIDGE ENERGY, LIMITED PARTNERSHIPParties: ENBRIDGE ENERGY PARTNERS LP | Enbridge Energy Company, Inc | ENBRIDGE ENERGY MANAGEMENT, LLC | ENBRIDGE ENERGY, LIMITED PARTNERSHIP | Enbridge Inc | Enbridge Partners | ENBRIDGE PIPELINES (EASTERN ACCESS) LLC | ENBRIDGE PIPELINES (L3R) LLC | ENBRIDGE PIPELINES (LAKEHEAD) LLC | ENBRIDGE PIPELINES (MAINLINE EXPANSION) LLC | ENBRIDGE PIPELINES (WISCONSIN) INC 
								
								Document Date: 1/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
34) FIRST AMENDMENT TO SIXTH AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF PREFERRED APARTMENT COMMUNITIES OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, L.PParties: PREFERRED APARTMENT COMMUNITIES INC | Initial Limited | PREFERRED APARTMENT COMMUNITIES OPERATING PARTNERSHIP, LP | Preferred Apartment Communities, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/26/2017

35) AMENDMENT NO. 2 TO FIFTH AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF MAGELLAN MIDSTREAM PARTNERS, L.PParties: MAGELLAN MIDSTREAM PARTNERS LP | All Limited Partners | Magellan GP, LLC | Magellan Midstream Partners, LP 
								
								Document Date: 1/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
36) AMENDMENT NO. 4 TO THE SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF DCP MIDSTREAM PARTNERS, LPParties: DCP MIDSTREAM, LP | DCP MIDSTREAM GP, LLC | DCP Midstream GP, LP | DCP MIDSTREAM PARTNERS, LP 
								
								Document Date: 1/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
37) THIRD AMENDMENT TO FIRST AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF GLADSTONE COMMERCIAL LIMITED PARTNERSHIPParties: GLADSTONE COMMERCIAL CORP | GLADSTONE COMMERCIAL CORPORATION | Gladstone Commercial Limited Partnership | ORIGINAL LIMITED 
								
								Document Date: 1/12/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
38) AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIPParties: FIRST CAPITAL REAL ESTATE TRUST INC | Corporate/Limited Liability Company Additional Limited | First Capital Real Estate Operating Partnership, LP | First Capital Real Estate Trust Incorporated | INITIAL LIMITED | PRESIDENTIAL REALTY CORPORATION | PRESIDENTIAL REALTY OPERATING PARTNERSHIP LP 
								
								Document Date: 1/12/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
39) AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIPParties: PRESIDENTIAL REALTY CORP/DE/ | Corporate/Limited Liability Company Additional Limited | First Capital Real Estate Operating Partnership, LP | First Capital Real Estate Trust Incorporated | INITIAL LIMITED | PRESIDENTIAL REALTY CORPORATION | PRESIDENTIAL REALTY OPERATING PARTNERSHIP LP 
								
								Document Date: 1/12/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
40) FORM OF AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF INVITATION HOMES OPERATING PARTNERSHIP LP a Delaware limited partnershipParties: INVITATION HOMES INC. | INVITATION HOMES INC | INVITATION HOMES OP GP LLC | INVITATION HOMES OPERATING PARTNERSHIP LP | SPECIAL LIMITED 
								
								Document Date: 1/6/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
41) OPERATING PARTNERSHIP AND THE PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENTParties: GRAMERCY PROPERTY TRUST | Operating Partnership | Securities Exchange Commission 
								
								Document Date: 1/6/2017

42) AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIPParties: ROYAL ENERGY RESOURCES, INC. | RHINO GP LLC | RHINO RESOURCE PARTNERS LP 
								
								Document Date: 1/6/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
43) AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF CHENIERE CORPUS CHRISTI PIPELINE, L.PParties: CHENIERE CORPUS CHRISTI HOLDINGS, LLC | Cheniere Corpus Christi Pipeline, LP | CORPUS CHRISTI PIPELINE GP, LLC | Initial General Partner and Initial Limited 
								
								Document Date: 1/5/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
44) SECOND AMENDMENT TO THE FOURTH AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF GPT OPERATING PARTNERSHIP LPParties: GRAMERCY PROPERTY TRUST | GPT OPERATING PARTNERSHIP LP 
								
								Document Date: 1/4/2017

45) BGC HOLDINGS, L.P. TWELFTH AMENDMENT TO AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, AS AMENDED AND RESTATEDParties: BGC PARTNERS, INC. | BGC HOLDINGS, LP 
								
								Document Date: 12/16/2016

46) AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF PILLARSTONE CAPITAL REIT OPERATING PARTNERSHIP LPParties: PILLARSTONE CAPITAL REIT | PILLARSTONE CAPITAL REIT OPERATING PARTNERSHIP LP 
								
								Document Date: 12/13/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
47) AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF PILLARSTONE CAPITAL REIT OPERATING PARTNERSHIP LPParties: WHITESTONE REIT | PILLARSTONE CAPITAL REIT OPERATING PARTNERSHIP LP 
								
								Document Date: 12/9/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
48) SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF DOMINION MIDSTREAM PARTNERS, LP TABLE OF CONTENTSParties: DOMINION MIDSTREAM PARTNERS, LP | Dominion Midstream GP, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 12/1/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
49) FIFTH AMENDED AND RESTATED LIMITED PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT OF EVERCORE LP Dated as of November 15, 2016Parties: EVERCORE PARTNERS INC. | APPLICABLE LIMITED | EVERCORE LP | Evercore Partners Inc 
								Law Firm: Wachtell Lipton
								Document Date: 11/18/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
50) HARTMAN XX LIMITED PARTNERSHIP DEED OF TRUST, SECURITY AGREEMENT, FINANCING STATEMENT, AND ABSOLUTE ASSIGNMENT OF RENTSParties: HARTMAN VREIT XXI, INC. | HARTMAN VILLAGE POINTE, LLC | Hartman XX Limited Partnership 
								
								Document Date: 11/18/2016

 




Browse by StateGo directly to a specific page of results:1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132333435363738394041424344454647 
 
 

 












 

Fundings, investments, venture capital activity































Want to see more?Want to find out who got funded, and who’s funding the next big thing? in real time? all across the world? tailored to your specific areas of focus?100+ deals per dayGet access to the most exhaustive worldwide funding watch on the web!Comprehensive funding informationKnow about who invested in a company, which sites covered the event, the funding history, etc.Exclusive insightsView original analytics such as most dynamic industries, most active investors, and more!Stay aware!Get emailed when deals critical to your business happen. Filter by region, industry and topics of interest.As seen onHave a login?Sign inRegister now!It's free!Use your social accountOr fill in the quick form:Register nowpromise we won't spamSign invia your social account:via your existing WGF account:Remember meRegister, it's freeForgot your password?SIGN INForgot your password?Enter your e-mail and we will send you your new password.reset passwordThe world's largest funding base/companies/?letter=R&size=200&page=27section=companies&country=&letter=R&size=200&page=27CompaniesFilter byCompanies per pageAlphabetABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZspecial charsAll countriesAll industries100200300RRxdispense IncRxense IncRxfunctionRxh Holdings LpRxi PharmaceuticalsRxinnovation IncRxpredict IncRxpress Investments IncRxr 1330 Sixth Ave Reit LlcRxr 470 Vanderbilt Reit Ii LlcRxr 470 Vanderbilt Reit LlcRxr Atlas Reit LlcRxr Fund Ii 1166 Reit LlcRxr New York Metro Emerging Sub-mark...Rxr New York Metro Emerging Sub-mark...Rxr New York Metro Emerging Sub-mark...Rxr New York Metro Emerging Sub-mark...Rxr New York Metro Emerging Sub-mark...Rxr Po Reit LlcRxr Re Vaf - Fund Iii Parallel A LpRxr Re Vaf - Fund Iii Parallel B (re...Rxr Re Vaf - Fund Iii Parallel B LpRxr Realty LlcRxr Sl Reit LlcRxresults LlcRxrevu IncRxwiki IncRyan Fund Ix LlcRyan Gold CorpRyan Green Apartments LlcRyan Joint VentureRyan Labs IncRyan Specialty Group LlcRyan X LlcRyanik Boca River Long Beach Partner...Ryanik Boca River Long Beach Partner...Ryanik Bocariver Long Beach Partners...Ryce IncRyde Technologies Pte LtdRyder Court Global Emerging Markets ...Ryder Court Global Opportunities Fun...Ryder Court International Select Fun...Ryder Court International Small Comp...Ryder Court Us Small Mid Cap Equity ...Rydesharyng LpRydeshift IncRye Ambulatory Surgery Center LlcRye Catcher Films LlcRye Patch Gold CorpRyett Capital Partners LpRyft Systems IncRyla Teleservices IncRyland Oil CorpRylar Innovations Group LlcRym GamesRymed Technologies IncRyno Motors IncRyonet CorpRypos IncRys&co General PartnershipRythmRythmia Group IncRyu Apparel IncRyver IncRyz Media IncRyzac IncRyzing LlcRzdPrevious1...14...24252627